Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.145

Ambulance and aid vehicles—Self-inspection program.

The secretary shall adopt a self-inspection program to assure compliance with minimum standards for vehicles and for medical equipment and personnel on all licensed vehicles. The self-inspection shall coincide with the vehicle licensing cycle and shall be recorded on forms provided by the department. The department may perform an on-site inspection of any licensed service or vehicles as needed.

[ 1987 c 214 s 13.]